Tennessee, session 114, HB1091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-5-502(d)(3), is amended by
deleting "ninety (90)" and substituting instead "eighty (80)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1091
002847
- 1 -